Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6310.02
Asbestos occupations; license; renewal; continuing competency requirements.

(1) Any individual licensed in any of the asbestos occupations prescribed in section 71-6310, as a condition for license renewal, shall complete continuing competency activities as required by the department and shall be examined and approved by a physician as prescribed for initial applicants in section 71-6310. The licensee shall submit evidence as required by the department of satisfaction of the requirements of this section.

(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish the continuing competency requirements pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act. Continuing education is sufficient to meet continuing competency requirements. The requirements may also include, but not be limited to, one or more of the continuing competency activities listed in section 38-145 which a licensee may select as an alternative to continuing education.

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 100;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1252.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.